Maryland, session 2025, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE
RETAIL SALE OF GOODS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO EACH COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY.
(C) IF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY ENACTS A LOCAL LAW THAT
AUTHORIZES OR REQUIRES A RETAILER TO CHARGE A FEE AT THE POINT OF SALE
FOR PROVIDING A PLASTIC OR PAPER CARRYOUT BAG TO A CUSTOMER, THE COUNTY
OR MUNICIPALITY SHALL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1232*

HOUSE BILL 1232
(1) REQUIRE A RETAILER THAT CHARGES THE FEE TO PROVIDE A
RECEIPT TO A CUSTOMER THAT CLEARLY IDENTIFIES THE FEE AMOUNT CHARGED
AND NUMBER OF PLASTIC OR PAPER CARRYOUT BAGS ISSUED TO THE CUSTOMER;
AND
(2) PROVIDE FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION THROUGH A SYSTEM OF CIVIL PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS AS
FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING
$250;
(II) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING
$500; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.